apertium-epo-fra.fra.dix
<pardef n="l/e_sien__prn">
  <e>       <p><l>a<b/>sienne</l><r>e<b/>sien<s n="prn"/><s n="pos"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>e<b/>sien</l> <r>e<b/>sien<s n="prn"/><s n="pos"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>es<b/>siennes</l><r>e<b/>sien<s n="prn"/><s n="pos"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>es<b/>siens</l><r>e<b/>sien<s n="prn"/><s n="pos"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="l/e_tien__prn">
  <e>       <p><l>a<b/>tienne</l><r>e<b/>tien<s n="prn"/><s n="pos"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>e<b/>tien</l> <r>e<b/>tien<s n="prn"/><s n="pos"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>es<b/>tiennes</l><r>e<b/>tien<s n="prn"/><s n="pos"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>es<b/>tiens</l><r>e<b/>tien<s n="prn"/><s n="pos"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="l/e_vôtre__prn">
  <e>       <p><l>a<b/>vôtre</l><r>e<b/>vôtre<s n="prn"/><s n="pos"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>e<b/>vôtre</l><r>e<b/>vôtre<s n="prn"/><s n="pos"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>es<b/>vôtres</l><r>e<b/>vôtre<s n="prn"/><s n="pos"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
-->
<pardef n="mien__prn">
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="prn"/><s n="pos"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>s</l>         <r><s n="prn"/><s n="pos"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ne</l>        <r><s n="prn"/><s n="pos"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>nes</l>       <r><s n="prn"/><s n="pos"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="nôtre__prn">
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="prn"/><s n="pos"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="prn"/><s n="pos"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>s</l>         <r><s n="prn"/><s n="pos"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="l/equel__rel">
  <e>       <p><l>aquelle</l>   <r>equel<s n="prn"/><s n="rel"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>equel</l>     <r>equel<s n="prn"/><s n="rel"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>esquelles</l> <r>equel<s n="prn"/><s n="rel"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>esquels</l>   <r>equel<s n="prn"/><s n="rel"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="l/ire__vblex">
  <e>       <p><l>ira</l>       <r>ire<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>irai</l>      <r>ire<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>iraient</l>   <r>ire<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>irais</l>     <r>ire<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>irais</l>     <r>ire<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>irait</l>     <r>ire<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>iras</l>      <r>ire<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ire</l>       <r>ire<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>irez</l>      <r>ire<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>iriez</l>     <r>ire<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>irions</l>    <r>ire<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>irons</l>     <r>ire<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>iront</l>     <r>ire<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>is</l>        <r>ire<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>is</l>        <r>ire<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__encimp"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>is</l>        <r>ire<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>is</l>        <r>ire<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>isaient</l>   <r>ire<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>isais</l>     <r>ire<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>isais</l>     <r>ire<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>isait</l>     <r>ire<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>isant</l>     <r>ire<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r></p></e>
<!-- <e>       <p><l>isant</l>     <r>ire<s n="vblex"/><s n="ppres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="ND"/></r></p></e> -->
  <e>       <p><l>ise</l>       <r>ire<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ise</l>       <r>ire<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>isent</l>     <r>ire<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>isent</l>     <r>ire<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ises</l>      <r>ire<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>isez</l>      <r>ire<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>isez</l>      <r>ire<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__encimp"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>isez</l>      <r>ire<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>isiez</l>     <r>ire<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>isiez</l>     <r>ire<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>isions</l>    <r>ire<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>isions</l>    <r>ire<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>isons</l>     <r>ire<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>isons</l>     <r>ire<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__encimp"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>isons</l>     <r>ire<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>it</l>        <r>ire<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>u</l>         <r>ire<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ue</l>        <r>ire<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ues</l>       <r>ire<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>urent</l>     <r>ire<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>us</l>        <r>ire<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>us</l>        <r>ire<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>us</l>        <r>ire<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>usse</l>      <r>ire<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ussent</l>    <r>ire<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>usses</l>     <r>ire<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ussiez</l>    <r>ire<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ussions</l>   <r>ire<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ut</l>        <r>ire<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ûmes</l>      <r>ire<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ût</l>        <r>ire<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ûtes</l>      <r>ire<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<e lm="élire">           <i>él</i><par n="l/ire__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="lequel">          <i>l</i><par n="l/equel__rel"/></e>
 <e lm="le sien">         <i>l</i><par n="l/e_sien__prn"/></e>
 <e lm="le tien">         <i>l</i><par n="l/e_tien__prn"/></e>
 <e lm="le vôtre">        <i>l</i><par n="l/e_vôtre__prn"/></e>
<e lm="lire">            <i>l</i><par n="l/ire__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="lire à haute voix"><i>l</i><par n="l/ire__vblex"/><p><l><b/>à<b/>haute<b/>voix</l><r><g><b/>à<b/>haute<b/>voix</g></r></p></e>
<e lm="lire d'un bout à l'autre"><i>l</i><par n="l/ire__vblex"/><p><l><b/>d'un<b/>bout<b/>à<b/>l'autre</l><r><g><b/>d'un<b/>bout<b/>à<b/>l'autre</g></r></p></e>
<e lm="mien">            <i>mien</i><par n="mien__prn"/></e>
<e lm="nôtre">           <i>nôtre</i><par n="nôtre__prn"/></e>
<e lm="réélire">         <i>réél</i><par n="l/ire__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="relire">          <i>rel</i><par n="l/ire__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="sien">            <i>sien</i><par n="mien__prn"/></e>
<e lm="tien">            <i>tien</i><par n="mien__prn"/></e>
<e lm="vôtre">           <i>vôtre</i><par n="nôtre__prn"/></e>
<e r="LR" lm="élire">    <p><l>El</l>        <r>Él</r></p><par n="l/ire__vblex"/></e>
<e r="LR" lm="lire à haute voix"><i>l</i><par n="l/ire__vblex"/><p><l><b/>pas<b/>à<b/>haute<b/>voix</l><r><g><b/>à<b/>haute<b/>voix</g></r></p></e>
<e r="LR" lm="lire d'un bout à l'autre"><i>l</i><par n="l/ire__vblex"/><p><l><b/>pas<b/>d'un<b/>bout<b/>à<b/>l'autre</l><r><g><b/>d'un<b/>bout<b/>à<b/>l'autre</g></r></p></e>
